Massachusetts, session 194th, H3880.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40 of the General is hereby amended by inserting after section 22A3/4 the
following section:-
Section 22A5/6. (a) A municipality may designate a parking space in off street parking
lots, large retail parking lots and parking garages for the parking veteran in a motor vehicle that
is owned and operated by the veteran and that displays a veteran registration plate issued
pursuant to section 2 of chapter 90. The municipality shall be permitted to reserve not more than
two parking spaces in parking lots with more than one thousand parking spaces. Municipalities
shall also be permitted to reserve not more than two additional spaces for every additional five
hundred parking spaces in a parking lot. The municipality shall erect and maintain a sign
designating such a parking space that shall bear the words ''Veteran Parking Only— this space is
reserved for those who have served. Unauthorized Vehicles May Be Removed At The Vehicle
Owner's Expense''.
of 2

(b) A violation of subsection (a) shall be punished by a fine of $100 and the city or town
may provide for the removal of a vehicle in the manner provided in section 22D. The penalty
shall not be a surchargeable offense under section 113B of chapter 175.
(c) The Chief Executive Officer, as defined in section 2 of Chapter 21D of the General
Laws, shall work with the owning or managing party of eligible parking lots and garages
pursuant to subsection (a) for the purposes of carrying out subsection (a).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2